New York, session 2025-2026, A3325.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The public health law is amended by adding a new section 2 2164-a to read as follows: 3 § 2164-a. Immunization exemptions. No organization or entity, includ- 4 ing a local government, school board, business, or employer, which 5 requires immunization against any disease shall permit any exemption 6 from such requirement except a medical exemption. Any provision of a 7 law, rule, regulation, or policy adopted by any entity that allows for a 8 non-medical exemption to an immunization requirement shall be deemed 9 null and void. A medical exemption shall be established in the same 10 manner as set forth in subdivision eight of section twenty-one hundred 11 sixty-four of this title. 12 § 2. Subdivision 9 of section 2165 of the public health law is 13 REPEALED. 14 § 3. Severability. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, 15 section or part of this title shall be adjudged by any court of compe- 16 tent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair 17 or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its opera- 18 tion to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section or part 19 thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment 20 shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared the intent of the legis- 21 lature that this act would have been enacted even if such invalid 22 provisions had not been included herein. 23 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07135-01-5